New York, session 2025-2026, S10038.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 13-0339-a of the 2 environmental conservation law, as amended by chapter 316 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 a. Atlantic cod (Gadus morhua) until December thirty-first, two thou- 5 sand [twenty-six] twenty-nine, 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14997-01-6